Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-806
Public indecency; penalty.

(1) A person, eighteen years of age or over, commits public indecency if such person performs or procures, or assists any other person to perform, in a public place and where the conduct may reasonably be expected to be viewed by members of the public:

(a) An act of sexual penetration; or

(b) An exposure of the genitals of the body done with intent to affront or alarm any person; or

(c) A lewd fondling or caressing of the body of another person of the same or opposite sex.

(2) Public indecency is a Class II misdemeanor.

(3) It shall not be a violation of this section for an individual to breast-feed a child in a public place.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 162;

Laws 2019, LB209, § 4.